Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 7

Federal Property In Arkansas

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1903, No. 180, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1959, No. 256, § 5: Jan. 1, 1960.

22-7-101. Purchase of real property by United States — Limited cession of jurisdiction — Right to tax.

(a)

The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United States of any site or ground for the erection of any armory, arsenal, fort, fortification, navy yard, customhouse, lighthouse, lock, dam, fish hatchery, or other public buildings of any kind.

(b)

The jurisdiction of this state within and over all grounds purchased by the United States within the limits of this state is ceded to the United States, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent execution of any process of this state, civil or criminal, upon any person who may be on these grounds.

(c)

This state releases and relinquishes its right to tax any site, grounds, or real estate, and all improvements which may be there or erected there during the time the United States remains the owner thereof.

History.

Acts 1903, No. 180, §§ 1, 2, p. 346; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4564, 4565; Pope's Dig., §§ 5644, 5645; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1101, 10-1102.

22-7-102. Transfer of legislative jurisdiction over lands — Procedure.

(a)(1)

In order to acquire all or any measure of legislative jurisdiction of the kind addressed in United States Constitution, Article I, Section 8, Clause 17, over any land or other area, or in order to relinquish that legislative jurisdiction or any measure thereof which may be vested in the United States, the United States, acting through a duly authorized department, agency, or officer shall file with the Governor a notice of intention to acquire or relinquish legislative jurisdiction, together with a sufficient number of duly authenticated copies thereof to meet the recording requirements of subsection (c) of this section.

(2)

The notice shall contain a description adequate to permit accurate identification of the boundaries of the land or other area for which the change in jurisdictional status is sought and a precise statement of the measure of legislative jurisdiction sought to be transferred.

(3)

Immediately upon receipt of the notice, the Governor shall furnish the Attorney General with a copy and shall request his or her comments and recommendations thereon.

(b)(1)

The Governor shall transmit the notice, together with his or her comments and recommendations, if any, and the comments and recommendations of the Attorney General, if any, to the next session of the General Assembly, which shall be constitutionally competent to consider the notice, comments, and recommendations.

(2)

Unless prior to the expiration of the legislative session to which the notice is transmitted the General Assembly has adopted an act approving the transfer of legislative jurisdiction as proposed in the notice, the transfer shall not be effective.

(c)

The Governor shall cause a duly authenticated copy of the notice and act to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county where the land or other area affected by the transfer of jurisdiction is situated, and upon such recordation, the transfer of jurisdiction shall take effect.

(d)

The Governor shall cause copies of all documents recorded pursuant to this section to be filed with the Secretary of State.

(e)

In no event shall any transfer of legislative jurisdiction between the United States and this state take effect, nor shall the Governor transmit any notice proposing such a transfer pursuant to subsection (b) of this section unless, under the applicable laws of the United States:

(1)

This state shall have jurisdiction to tax private persons, private transactions, and private property, real and personal, resident, occurring, or situated within the land or other area to the same extent that this state has jurisdiction to tax persons, transactions, and property, resident, occurring, or situated generally within this state;

(2)

Any civil or criminal process lawfully issued by competent authority of this state or any of its subdivisions may be served and executed within the land or other area to the same extent and with the same effect as the process may be served and executed generally within this state, except that the service and execution of process within land or other areas over which the federal government exercises jurisdiction shall be subject to such rules and regulations issued by authorized officers of the federal government, or of any department, independent establishment, or agency thereof, as may be reasonably necessary to prevent interference with the carrying out of federal functions; and

(3)

This state shall exercise over the land or other area the same legislative jurisdiction which it exercises over land or other areas generally within this state, except that the United States shall not be required to forego such measure of exclusive legislative jurisdiction as may be vested in or retained by it over the land or other area pursuant to this section, and this state's exercise of jurisdiction shall be without prejudice to the right of the United States to assert and exercise such concurrent legislative jurisdiction as may be vested in or retained by it over the land or other area.

(f)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent or impair any transfer of legislative jurisdiction to this state occurring by operation of law.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 256, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1127 — 10-1129.

Subchapter 2

— Particular Properties

Preambles.

Acts 1867, No. 60, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by a resolution of Congress, approved April 13, 1866, the Secretary of War was authorized and required to take immediate measures to preserve from desecration the graves of the soldiers of the United States who fell in battle or died of disease in the field and in the hospital during the war of the rebellion; and to secure suitable burial places in which they may be properly interred; and

“Whereas, the Secretary of War is about to purchase suitable grounds within the limits of this state for the establishment thereon of ‘national cemeteries,’ within which are to be buried the bodies of those described in said resolution; and

“Whereas, it is provided in paragraph 1059, United States Army regulations, as revised, 1863, that previous to the expenditure of any money in the purchase of any land within any state of the United States for the use of the general government, the legislature of the state within which such purchase shall be made shall first cede all jurisdiction over such land….”

Acts 1873, No. 10, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by an Act of Congress, approved June 7, 1872, entitled ‘An act to provide for a building for the use of the federal courts, post office, internal revenue, and other civil offices in the city of Little Rock, Arkansas,’ an appropriation of $100,000 was made to carry out the objects of said act; and

“Whereas, it is provided by said act ‘That no part of the sum therein appropriated shall be used or expended until the State of Arkansas shall duly release and relinquish its jurisdiction over the same, and its right to tax said site and the property which may be thereon during the time the United States shall be, or remain, the owner thereof.’

“Therefore….”

Acts 1889, No. 11, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by an Act of Congress entitled, ‘An act for a public building at Helena, Arkansas,’ approved April 11, 1888, an appropriation of $75,000 was made to carry out the objects of said act; and

“Whereas, it is provided by said act ‘that no part of said sum shall be expended until a valid title to the said site shall be vested in the United States, nor until the State of Arkansas shall cede to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over the same during the time the United States shall be or remain the owner thereof, for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of said state and the service of civil process therein;’

“Therefore….”

Acts 1889, No. 40, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by an Act of Congress entitled, ‘An act for a public building at Texarkana, Arkansas, approved, 1888’ an appropriation of $10,000 was made to carry out the objects of said act; and

“Whereas, it is provided by said act that no part of said sum shall be expended until a valid title to the said site shall be vested in the United States, nor until the State of Arkansas shall cede to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over the same during the time the United States shall be, or remain, the owner thereof, for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of said state and the service of civil process therein;

“Therefore….”

Acts 1891, No. 19, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by an Act of Congress entitled ‘An act for a public building at Camden, Arkansas, and appropriating $25,000 to carry out the objects of said act’; and

“Whereas, it is provided by said act that no part of said sum shall be expended until a valid title to the said site shall be vested in the United States; nor until the State of Arkansas shall cede to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over the same during the time the United States shall be or remain the owner thereof for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of said state and the service of civil process therein;

“Therefore….”

Acts 1925, No. 230, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the government of the United States without consent of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas has established and will acquire additional areas of forest lands in said state for the purpose of conserving the navigability of navigable streams, and said lands and waters thereon are and will be stocked naturally and artificially with game animals, game and non-game birds and fish; and

“Whereas, in order adequately to enjoy and protect the occupancy and use of said area, it is important that the United States be fully authorized to make all needful rules and regulations in respect to such animals, birds and fish;

“Therefore….”

Acts 1935, No. 181, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the government proposes to buy large tracts of nonproductive submarginal lands and set same aside as parks, recreational or other appropriate uses; and

“Whereas, this program will be of great benefit to the people generally, and the state desires to cooperate in that program; and

“Whereas, the state owns certain lands in the areas now proposed, and which may hereafter be proposed, as proper submarginal land projects, and it is the policy of the state to grant the government such lands;

“Therefore….”

Acts 1983, No. 239, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the United States presently exercises exclusive legislative jurisdiction over approximately 31.5 acres of fee-owned land comprising the United States Army Reserve Center located at 8001 Camp Robinson Road in North Little Rock, Arkansas; and

“Whereas, the United States wishes to relinquish to the State of Arkansas such legislative jurisdiction as will enable the state and its political subdivisions to exercise, concurrently with the United States, law enforcement powers within the Reserve Center area; and

“Whereas, Act 256 of 1959, provides that when the Governor receives notice from the United States of the intention to relinquish legislative jurisdiction over such lands, the Governor shall submit the question of accepting such jurisdiction to the next session of the state legislature for adoption and further provides that unless prior to the expiration of that legislative session the legislature adopts an act approving the transfer, the transfer shall not be effective; and

“Whereas, it is in the best interest of the State of Arkansas and Pulaski County that the state accept concurrent jurisdiction over the hereinafter described area;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1867, No. 60, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1873, No. 10, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1889, No. 20, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 35, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1903, No. 114, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1917, No. 148, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 533, § 2: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 28, 1919.

Acts 1925, No. 230, § 2: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 27, 1925.

Acts 1927, No. 108, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1933, No. 166, § 1: approved Mar. 25, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, there is an immediate need for jurisdiction of the lands herein, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1935, No. 88, § 3: Mar. 2, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the various counties of this state are losing much revenue by reason of the present inability of the state to sell its tax forfeited lands to the United States government for forestry purposes, and, whereas, it is necessary to perfect functioning of the various county governments that additional funds be supplied; now, therefore, an emergency is declared and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall become effective immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1935, No. 181, § 3: Mar. 22, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, some areas have already been designated by the federal government in the State of Arkansas as proper for the operation of its submarginal land program, and large numbers of people are working to put the program in effect, and it is necessary that the state be prepared to cooperate in said program when it is necessary and proper to do so, and an emergency is, therefore, hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in full force immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 204, § 2: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1975, No. 122, § 4: Feb. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws of the state are not clear regarding the authority of the state and of the various counties to transfer lands to the United States Government in connection with navigation projects, wildlife refuge projects and other projects highly beneficial to the state; that it is essential to the development of certain such projects that the law be clarified immediately in order to specifically authorize the transfer of state and county owned lands to the United States Government for such projects; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 5: Aug. 15, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly meeting in Extraordinary Session that it is imperative that the veterans of the State of Arkansas be able to receive medical care equal to any available in this country and that the emotionally disturbed youth in our state have available an intensified mental health treatment program. It is therefore resolved that an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 1111, § 3 and No. 1114, § 3: Apr. 26, 1979. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that the immediate effectiveness of this act is necessary for providing psychiatric nursing home care in the State of Arkansas. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 963, § 7: Mar. 29, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “To preserve the public peace, it is necessary that the Act become immediately operative. It is therefore declared to be an emergency measure.”

22-7-201. National cemeteries.

The jurisdiction of this state within and over all lands purchased by the United States on which national cemeteries may be established within the limits of this state is ceded to the United States so far as the permanent enclosures of such national cemeteries may extend and no further.

History.

Acts 1867, No. 60, § 1, p. 153; C. & M. Dig., § 4553; Pope's Dig., § 5633; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1104.

22-7-202. National forests generally.

(a)

The consent of the State of Arkansas is given to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, by exchange, or otherwise with adequate compensation, of such land in Arkansas as, in the opinion of the federal government, may be needed for the establishment, consolidation, and extension of national forests in the state for the purpose of the Weeks Law.

(b)

No owner of land which the United States proposes to acquire under the provisions of this section shall be required to sell by institution of proceedings for condemnation, except for such tracts as are needed for access, rights-of-way, those having a peculiar recreational or scenic value, and other such uses in the public interest.

(c)

Power is conferred upon the United States Congress to pass laws and to make, or provide for the making of, such rules and regulations of both a civil and criminal nature, and provide punishment for the violation thereof as, in its judgment, may be necessary for the administration, control, and protection of any lands acquired under the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 148, §§ 1, 2, p. 797; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4566, 4567; Acts 1927, No. 108, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 5646, 5647; Acts 1963, No. 204, § 1; 1967, No. 657, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1105, 10-1106.

U.S. Code.

The Weeks Law, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. §§ 480, 500, 515-519, 521, 552, and 563.

22-7-203. National forests — Fish and game regulations.

(a)

The consent of the State of Arkansas is given to the making by the United States Congress, or under its authority, of all such rules and regulations as the federal government may determine to be needful in respect to game animals and game and nongame birds and fish on, in, or over national forestlands within the State of Arkansas.

(b)

The rules and regulations must be approved by the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission before they can be enforced.

(c)

The authority to enforce concurrent rules and regulations is extended jointly to the federal government and to the commission.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 230, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 5648, 6000; Acts 1941, No. 272, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1107.

22-7-204. National forests — Sale of tax-forfeited lands to United States Forest Service.

(a)

Upon application of any duly authorized person of the United States Forest Service to purchase tax-forfeited lands lying within or contiguous to any national forest for the purpose of adding the lands to the national forest, the Commissioner of State Lands shall set aside and withhold the lands from sale for such time as may be necessary for the federal government to perfect its title in and to the lands.

(b)

The act of the Commissioner of State Lands to set aside the land shall vest title in the United States to the extent that title in the lands can be perfected.

(c)

Immediately upon the perfection and approval of the title in the lands, the purchaser shall comply with the provisions of §§26-37-101 —26-37-105,26-37-201 —26-37-205, and26-37-301 —26-37-303, and, thereupon, the Commissioner of State Lands shall issue his or her deed conveying to the purchaser all the rights, title, and interest of the State of Arkansas in and to the lands.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 88, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 8722, 8723; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1108, 10-1109.

22-7-205. Ouachita National Forest and Ozark National Forest — Sale of school or tax lands.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized, at his or her discretion, to negotiate with the representatives of the federal government for the sale of all or any part of the school or tax lands situated within the Ouachita National Forest and Ozark National Forest. Upon reaching a satisfactory price agreement, he or she is authorized to give options, to sign purchase contracts, to execute deeds to the United States or its authorized representative, and to accept payment for the lands but only if the sales are made at a price of not less than two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre.

(b)

No land shall be sold to the federal government for less than its appraised value, with such value to be ascertained and such sale to be made as provided by law for the sale of state and school lands.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit land being sold to private parties in the manner provided by law unless under the control of and option to the federal government and during the term of the option, except that no such lands shall be sold for less than two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 533, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 6786; Pope's Dig., § 8721; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1110.

22-7-206. Waterfowl and wildlife refuges.

(a)

For the purpose of more effectively cooperating with the United States in the acquisition, development, and maintenance of refuges for migratory waterfowl and other wildlife, consent is granted to the United States to acquire, by purchase, condemnation, gift, lease, or exchange, lands and waters within the State of Arkansas which the United States Secretary of Agriculture may deem necessary and suitable in furtherance of the Migratory Bird Treaty, the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, and the Migratory Bird Conservation Act.

(b)

The jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas, both civil and criminal, over persons in the areas acquired and on privately owned property thereon shall not be affected or changed by reason of their acquisition and administration by the United States as migratory waterfowl and other wildlife reservations, except insofar as the punishment of offenses against the United States is concerned.

(c)

Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the operation of the game laws of the State of Arkansas applying to migratory game birds, insofar as they do not permit what is forbidden by federal law.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 114, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5999; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1111.

U.S. Code.

The Migratory Bird Treaty, August 16, 1916, U.S. — Great Britain, referred to in this section, may be found at 39 Stat. 1702, T.S. 628.

The Migratory Bird Treaty Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. § 703 et seq. The Migratory Bird Conservation Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. § 715 et seq.

22-7-207. Submarginal land.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized and empowered to grant and convey to the federal government, or to any duly constituted agency thereof, all state lands owned by the State of Arkansas in any area designated as a submarginal land project when the Commissioner of State Lands has been officially notified by the proper government authority that the project has proceeded to the stage where it is necessary and proper for the state to execute and deliver the conveyance.

(b)

The state shall convey only such right in and to the lands as it may hold therein, and it shall not be liable on account of the failure of title of any of the lands.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 181, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 8747, 8748; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1112, 10-1113.

22-7-208. Building site — Little Rock.

(a)

The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United States of a site for public buildings mentioned in 17 Stat. 280, Ch. 324, and cedes jurisdiction to the United States over any lot, parcel, or block of ground within the corporate limits of the City of Little Rock, not exceeding in area three hundred feet (300') square, which may be purchased by the United States as a site for a building for the accommodation of the United States circuit and district courts, post office, internal revenue, and other government offices, under 17 Stat. 280, Ch. 324.

(b)

The state releases and relinquishes its right to tax the site and all improvements which may be thereon during the time the United States remains the owner thereof, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of this state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be on such site.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 10, § 1, p. 11; C. & M. Dig., § 4554; Pope's Dig., § 5634; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1114.

22-7-209. Building site — Helena.

The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United States of a site for a public building mentioned in 25 Stat. 84, Ch. 80, and cedes to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over any lot or block of ground within the corporate limits of the City of Helena, not exceeding in area three hundred sixty feet (360') square, which may be so purchased by the United States, during the time the United States remains the owner thereof, for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of the state and the service of civil process therein.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 11, § 1, p. 9; C. & M. Dig., § 4555; Pope's Dig., § 5635; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1115.

22-7-210. Building site — Texarkana.

The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United States of a site for a public building mentioned in 25 Stat. 87, Ch. 128, and cedes to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over any lot or block of ground within the corporate limits of the City of Texarkana, not exceeding in area three hundred sixty feet (360') square, which may be so purchased by the United States, during the time the United States remains the owner thereof, for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of the state and the service of civil process therein.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 40, § 1, p. 55; C. & M. Dig., § 4559; Pope's Dig., § 5639; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1116.

22-7-211. Building site — Camden.

The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United States of a site for a public building mentioned in 26 Stat. 702, Ch. 39, and cedes to the United States exclusive jurisdiction over any lot or block of ground within the corporate limits of the City of Camden, not exceeding in area three hundred sixty feet (360') square, which may be so purchased by the United States, during the time the United States remains the owner thereof, for all purposes except the administration of the criminal laws of the state and the service of civil process therein.

History.

Acts 1891, No. 19, § 1, p. 18; C. & M. Dig., § 4560; Pope's Dig., § 5640; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1117.

22-7-212. Cession of jurisdiction — Certain property in Fort Smith.

(a)

The jurisdiction of the state within and over block number five hundred fourteen (514), in the military reservation addition to the City of Fort Smith, Arkansas, as it is marked and designated by the field notes on file in the mayor's office and known as part of the abandoned military reservation at Fort Smith, donated to the city by the United States by 23 Stat. 19, Ch. 43, is ceded to the United States, so far as the limits of the block shall extend and no further.

(b)

The jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas is ceded to the United States over the block of ground situated between Rogers and Parker Avenues and Second and Third Streets, as it is marked and described on the map and plat of the reserve addition to the City of Fort Smith. The ground is a rectangular block three hundred feet (300') by two hundred ninety feet, two and three-quarter inches (290' 2¾"), upon which block is located the public buildings known as the United States Jail and Hospital, which block of ground and buildings situated thereon belong to the United States.

(c)

The jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas is ceded to the United States over the national cemetery and one hundred feet (100') around the walls of the cemetery, the cemetery being reserved as the property of the United States by 23 Stat. 19, Ch. 43, all of the land being under enclosure.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 20, § 1, p. 19; 1903, No. 114, § 1, p. 191; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4556, 4557; Pope's Dig., §§ 5636, 5637; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1118, 10-1119.

22-7-213. Acquisition of land in Pulaski County for military purposes.

(a)

The consent of the State of Arkansas is granted to the United States to purchase or acquire real property of not more than one thousand five (1,005) acres in extent in Pulaski County in this state for the purpose of a military post, fort, arsenal, or reservation.

(b)

Exclusive jurisdiction over the military post, fort, arsenal, or reservation, and the territory thereof, is ceded to the United States to be exercised so long as it remains the property of the United States.

(c)

The State of Arkansas releases and relinquishes its right to tax the site and all improvements thereon, during the time the United States remains the owner thereof, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of the state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be on the reservation or premises.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 35, §§ 1-3, p. 52; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4561-4563; Pope's Dig., §§ 5641-5643; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1120 — 10-1122.

22-7-214. Hot Springs National Park — Hot Springs Mountain.

(a)

Exclusive jurisdiction over that part of the Hot Springs National Park known and described as part of the Hot Springs Mountain, and whose limits are particularly described by the following boundary lines: Commencing at stone monument number seven (7) set upon the west line of Reserve Avenue and marking the boundary line of Hot Springs Mountain, and running thence in a northwesterly direction to a point upon the south line of Fountain Street to a stone monument numbered forty-two (42) and marking the boundary line of Hot Springs Mountain, thence along the south line of Fountain Street to its intersection with Central Avenue or to stone monument number thirty-three (33), thence south along the east line of Central Avenue to where it is intersected by Reserve Avenue at stone monument number thirty (30), thence along the north boundary line of Reserve Avenue to stone monument number seven (7), the point of commencement, all in township two (2) south, range nineteen (19) west, in the County of Garland, State of Arkansas, being a part of the permanent United States Hot Springs Reservation, is ceded to the United States to be exercised so long as it shall remain the property of the United States, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of the state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be on the reservation or premises.

(b)

The right to tax all structures and other property in private ownership on the Hot Springs National Park accorded the state by 26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, is reserved to the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1903, No. 30, § 1, p. 52; C. & M. Dig., § 4558; Pope's Dig., § 5638; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1123.

Publisher's Notes.

Although an attempt was made to repeal this section by Acts 1923, No. 407, § 1, p. 854 (Special Acts), it is doubtful that the attempted repeal could have any effect.

U.S. Code.

26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. § 365.

22-7-215. Hot Springs National Park — Block 82.

(a)

Exclusive jurisdiction over that part of the Hot Springs National Park known and described as block eighty-two (82) on the official plat of the United States Hot Springs Commission is ceded to the United States to be exercised so long as it shall remain the property of the United States, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of the state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be in the park or premises.

(b)

The right to tax all structures and other property in private ownership on the Hot Springs National Park, accorded the state by 26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, is reserved to the State of Arkansas as respects the tract ceded.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 56, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5649; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1124.

U.S. Code.

26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. § 365.

22-7-216. Hot Springs National Park — Tourist camps.

(a)

Exclusive jurisdiction over that part of the Hot Springs National Park known and described as the automobile tourist camp and whose limits are particularly described by the following boundary lines: Commencing at the stone marking at the northeast corner of the northeast quarter of section thirty-three (33) township two (2) south range nineteen (19) west, thence east for five hundred twenty-eight feet (528') along the south line of the southwest quarter of section twenty-seven (27) township two (2) south range nineteen (19) west, thence north parallel with the reservation line for one thousand three hundred twenty feet (1320') to the north line of the southwest quarter of the southwest quarter of section twenty-seven (27) township two (2) south range nineteen (19) west, thence west for five hundred twenty-eight feet (528') along the north line of the southwest quarter of the southwest quarter of section twenty-seven (27) township two (2) south range nineteen (19) west to the east line of Hot Springs National Park, thence south along the line of Hot Springs National Park to the place of beginning, in the County of Garland, State of Arkansas, being a part of the permanent United States Hot Springs Reservation, is ceded to the United States to be exercised so long as it remains the property of the United States, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of the state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be on the reservation or premises.

(b)

The right to tax all structures and other property in private ownership on the Hot Springs National Park, accorded the state by 26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, is reserved to the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 231, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5650; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1125.

U.S. Code.

26 Stat. 844, Ch. 533, § 5, referred to in this section, is codified as 16 U.S.C. § 365.

22-7-217. Hot Springs National Park — Land not previously ceded.

(a)

Exclusive jurisdiction over all lands which are or shall be included in the Hot Springs National Park in the State of Arkansas and which have not previously been included in acts of the General Assembly is ceded to the United States to be exercised so long as the lands remain the property of the United States, except that this cession of jurisdiction shall not prevent the execution of any process of the state, civil or criminal, on any person who may be in the park or on park premises.

(b)

The right to tax all structures and other property in private ownership on the Hot Springs National Park is reserved to the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 166, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5651; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-1126.

22-7-218 — 22-7-220. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 343, § 11, provided:

“The Pea Ridge National Park Commission created under Arkansas Code §22-7-218 is abolished.”

These sections, concerning the Pea Ridge National Park Commission, were repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 11. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-7-218. Acts 1957, No. 192, §§ 1-3.

22-7-219. Acts 1957, No. 192, § 4.

22-7-220. Acts 1957, No. 192, §§ 5, 6.

22-7-221. Lands necessary to Ouachita River Navigation Project.

(a)

The State of Arkansas or any agency or institution of the state having jurisdiction or authority over lands held in the name of the State of Arkansas, which lands are necessary or desirable in the furtherance of the Ouachita River Navigation Project and any wildlife refuge established in connection with the project, is authorized to give, donate, or otherwise transfer the lands, any portion thereof, or any interest therein to the federal government for such use.

(b)

Any county holding title to lands which are necessary or desirable for use in developing the project and any national wildlife refuge established in connection with the project is authorized to give, donate, or otherwise transfer the lands, any portion thereof, or any interest therein to the federal government for use in connection with the project or any national wildlife refuge established in connection with the project.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 122, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1130, 10-1131.

22-7-222. Concurrent jurisdiction — Certain tract in Camp Robinson.

(a)

The State of Arkansas accepts relinquishment by the United States to the State of Arkansas of such legislative jurisdiction as will enable the State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions to exercise, concurrently with the United States, law enforcement powers on a tract of land located in Pulaski County, Arkansas, being the same land excepted from the August 25, 1950, deed from the United States to the State of Arkansas covering Camp Robinson and being further described as Block Fifteen (15), bounded by Military Road, Dakota Avenue, 3rd Place, and the Missouri Pacific track, containing thirty-one and five-tenths (31.5) acres, more or less.

(b)

The Governor is authorized to take appropriate necessary steps, as described in §22-7-102, to accomplish the transfer of the legislative jurisdiction referred to in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 239, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-1132, 10-1133.

Cross References.

Camp Joseph T. Robinson, §12-63-401 et seq.